District of Columbia statutes.
38-2931

After-school programs.

The District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”) shall distribute any TANF or Health and Human Services funds that it receives that are designated for after-school programs, on an equitable basis, to DCPS and Public Charter Schools serving students with after-school programs, that receive funding based on the Uniformed Per Pupil Funding Formula.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3472, 49 DCR 6968
2001 Ed., § 38-2951.